Tennessee, session 114, SB1633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-115, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(e) If the defendant is convicted of two (2) or more offenses, irrespective of
whether the multiple offenses were part of a single criminal episode, involving more than
one (1) victim that is a minor, then the court shall order the sentences to run
consecutively unless the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the facts of
the case do not warrant the imposition of consecutive sentences and the imposition of
consecutive sentences would not be in the best interest of justice.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
SB1633
009948
- 1 -